Utah statutes.
41-6a-1607.   Parking lamps required -- Use when vehicle parked at night -- Head lamps dimmed.

(1) (a)  A vehicle shall be equipped with one or more parking lamps.

(b)  The parking lamps shall comply with requirements established under Section 41-6a-1601.

(2)  A vehicle parked or stopped on a roadway or shoulder, whether attended or unattended, shall display lighted parking lamps if conditions exist as specified under Subsection 41-6a-1603(1)(a).

(3)  Any lighted head lamps on a parked vehicle shall be dimmed.

